pt-PT: Tipo de pneu de bicicleta compatível: Com câmara de ar; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubular; Outro
nb: Kompatibel sykkeldekktype: Med slange; Slangeløs; Tubeless ready; Pariserdekk; Annet
sv: Kompatibel cykeldäckstyp: Däck med slang; Slanglöst (Tubeless); Tubeless ready; Tubdäck; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip biciklističke gume: Zračnica; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubularna; Ostalo
tr: Uyumlu bisiklet lastiği tipi: İç lastikli; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubular; Diğer
lt-LT: Suderinamas dviračio padangos tipas: Kamerinė; Bekamerinė; Pritaikyta bekamerinei sistemai (Tubeless ready); Klijuojama kamerinė padanga (Tubular); Kita
bg-BG: Съвместим тип велосипедна гума: Вътрешна гума; Без вътрешна гума (tubeless); Tubeless ready; Тубуларна; Друго
zh-CN: 适配的自行车轮胎类型: 有内胎; 无内胎; 准真空胎; 管胎; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ bicyklovej pneumatiky: S dušou; Bezdušové; Tubeless ready; Galúsky; Iné
zh-TW: 相容自行車輪胎類型: 內胎式; 無內胎式; 支援無內胎; 管胎; 其他
ko: 호환 자전거 타이어 유형: 튜브; 튜블리스; 튜블리스 레디; 튜블러; 기타
ru: Совместимый тип велосипедных шин: Камерные; Бескамерные; Tubeless ready; Трубки; Другое
ro-RO: Tip de anvelopă de bicicletă compatibilă: Cu cameră; Fără cameră (tubeless); Tubeless ready; Baeu (tubular); Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta združljive kolesarske pnevmatike: Z zračnico; Brez zračnice (tubeless); Pripravljeno za brez zračnice (tubeless ready); Tubular; Drugo
th: ประเภทของยางจักรยานที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ยางใน; ทิวบ์เลส; ทิวบ์เลสเรดดี้; ยางฮาล์ฟ (ทิวบูลาร์); อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de neumático de bicicleta compatible: Con cámara; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubular; Otro
ja: 互換性のある自転車タイヤタイプ: チューブ; チューブレス; チューブレスレディ; チューブラー; その他
vi: Loại lốp xe đạp tương thích: Có săm; Không săm; Sẵn sàng dùng không săm; Lốp ống; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní typ pneumatiky pro jízdní kola: Dušový; Bezdušový; Tubeless ready; Galuska; Ostatní
fr: Type de pneu de vélo compatible: Chambre à air; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Boyau; Autre
fi: Yhteensopiva polkupyörän rengastyyppi: Sisärengas; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tuubirengas; Muu
da: Kompatibel cykeldæktype: Med slange; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Lukkede ringe; Andet
nl: Compatibel fietsbandtype: Binnenband; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubes; Overige
de: Kompatibler Fahrradreifentyp: Mit Schlauch; Tubeless; Tubeless Ready; Schlauchreifen; Sonstige
en: Compatible bicycle tire type: Tube; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubular; Other
hu: Kompatibilis kerékpárabroncs-típus: Belsős; Belső nélküli; Tubeless ready; Szingó; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de pneu de bicicleta compatível: Com câmara; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubular; Outro
el: Συμβατός τύπος ελαστικού ποδηλάτου: Με σαμπρέλα; Χωρίς σαμπρέλα; Tubeless ready; Tubular; Άλλο
it: Tipo di pneumatico per bicicletta compatibile: Camera d'aria; Tubeless; Tubeless ready; Tubolare; Altro
pl: Kompatybilny typ opony rowerowej: Dętkowa; Bezdętkowa (tubeless); Tubeless ready; Szytka; Inny